Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-20,122
Off-campus location; claims; use National Provider Identifier.

(1) For purposes of this section:

(a) National Provider Identifier means the standard, unique health identifier number for a health care provider that is issued by the National Provider System in accordance with 45 C.F.R. part 162, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2023; and

(b) Off-campus location means a facility:

(i) With operations that are directly or indirectly owned or controlled by, in whole or in part, a hospital, or that is affiliated with a hospital, regardless of whether such off-campus location is operated by the same governing body as the hospital;

(ii) That is located in its entirety, including all real estate, structures, and permanent fixtures, more than one mile from the main campus of the hospital as measured from the closest real estate, structure, or permanent fixture of the main campus;

(iii) That provides services which are organizationally and functionally integrated with the hospital; and

(iv) That is an outpatient facility providing ambulatory surgery, urgent care, or emergency room services.

(2) An off-campus location of a hospital shall obtain a National Provider Identifier that is distinct from the National Provider Identifier used by the main campus of the affiliated hospital and any other off-campus location of such hospital and shall use such identifier on all claims for reimbursement or payment for health care services provided at such location.

Laws 2023, LB296, § 12.